vi: Lưu lượng xả: Đổ đáy; Đổ bên; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Chuyển; Khác
en: Discharge type: Bottom dump; Side dump; Standard; Transfer; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta istovarivanja: Izljev na dnu; Izljev sa strane; Standardni; Prijenos; Ostalo
cs: Typ vykládky: Spodní odpad; Boční odpad; Standardní; Přenos; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de descarga: Despejo inferior; Despejo lateral; Padrão; Transferência; Outro
zh-CN: 放电类型: 底部卸料; 侧面卸料; 标准; 转移; 其他
it: Tipo di scarico: Scarico posteriore; Scarico laterale; Standard; Trasferimento; Altro
sk-SK: Typ vykládky: Spodná výsypka; Bočná výsypka; Štandardný; Prestup; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de descarga: Despejo inferior; Despejo lateral; Padrão; Transferência; Outro
fi: Purkaustyyppi: Pohjatyhjennys; Sivutyhjennys; Tavallinen; Siirto; Muu
ja: 放電タイプ: ボトムダンプ; サイドダンプ; スタンダード; 移送; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta razkladanja: Spodnje odlagališče; Stransko odlagališče; Standardna; Prenos; Drugo
fr: Type de décharge: Déversement par le bas; Déversement latéral; Standard; Transfert; Autre
bg-BG: Тип разтоварване: Долно изхвърляне; Странично изхвърляне; Стандартен; Трансфер; Други
nb: Utløpstype: Bunndump; Sidedump; Standard; Overføring; Annet
es: Tipo de descarga: Descarga inferior; Descarga lateral; Estándar; Transferencia; Otros
hu: Kiürítés típusa: Alsó kiürítés; Oldalsó kiürítés; Normál; Transzfer; Egyéb
de: Entladungstyp: Bodenentleerer; Seitenkipper; Standard; Transfer; Sonstiges
tr: Deşarj Türü: Alt döküm; Yan boşaltma; Standart; Aktarma; Diğer
pl: Typ wypisu: Zrzut dolny; Zrzut boczny; Standard; Transfer; Inne
nl: Ontladingstype: Onderlosser; Zijlosser; Standaard; Overdracht; Andere
lt-LT: Iškrovimo tipas: Tuštinama per apačią; Tuštinama per šoną; Standartinis; Perkeliamas; Kita
ru: Тип разгрузки: Сброс снизу; Сброс сбоку; Стандартный; Передача; Другой
ro-RO: Tip de descărcare: Basculare prin partea inferioară; Basculare prin partea laterală; Standard; Transfer; Altele
sv: Uttömningstyp: Bottendumpning; Sidodumpning; Standard; Överföring; Övrigt
th: ประเภทการปล่อยประจุ: การปล่อยจากด้านล่าง; การปล่อยจากด้านข้าง; มาตรฐาน; การถ่ายโอน; อื่นๆ
da: Udledningstype: Nederste port; Sideport; Standard; Overførsel; Andet
zh-TW: 排放類型: 底卸; 側卸; 標準; 轉移; 其他
ko: 배출 유형: 바텀 덤프; 사이드 덤프; 표준; 운송; 기타
el: Τύπος εκφόρτωσης: Κάτω χωματερή; Πλευρική εκφόρτωση; Κανονικό; Μεταφορά; Άλλο